Maryland, session 2025, HB1110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1110*

HOUSE BILL 1110
(f) “Department” means the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services.
(q) (1) “State correctional facility” means a correctional facility that is
operated by the State.
(2) “State correctional facility” includes:
(i) the Patuxent Institution;
(ii) the Baltimore City Detention Center; and
(iii) the centralized booking facility in Baltimore City that is operated
by the Division of Pretrial Detention and Services in the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services.
2–601.
The Department shall:
(1) provide each individual who is released from a correctional facility with
a voter registration application and documentation with the individual’s discharge papers
that informs the individual that the individual’s voting rights have been restored;
(2) display a sign in each parole and probation office, in a conspicuous
location where notices to the public are customarily posted, indicating that any individual
who is no longer incarcerated has the right to vote; and
(3) post a notice, in a conspicuous location on the Department’s website,
indicating that any individual who is no longer incarcerated has the right to vote.
Article – Election Law
3–203.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(B) ON A WEEKLY BASIS, THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND
CORRECTIONAL SERVICES SHALL ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT TO THE STATE
BOARD A LIST THAT INCLUDES THE NAME AND NEW RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS OF EACH
INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS RELEASED FROM INCARCERATION AT A STATE
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY IN THE PRECEDING WEEK.

HOUSE BILL 1110 3
(C) ON RECEIPT OF THE LIST UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
THE STATE BOARD SHALL IDENTIFY EACH INDIVIDUAL ON THE LIST WHO WAS
REGISTERED TO VOTE IN THE STATE BEFORE BEING INCARCERATED AND WHOSE
NEW RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS IS LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(D) THE STATE BOARD SHALL AUTOMATICALLY RESTORE THE VOTER
REGISTRATION OF EACH INDIVIDUAL IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION AT THE INDIVIDUAL’S NEW RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS AND GIVE THE
INDIVIDUAL ACTIVE VOTER STATUS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.